Nevada, session 83, SB323.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 209 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall establish and administer a program
to provide telephone calls between offenders in the custody of the
Department who have been assigned to Florence McClure
Women’s Correctional Center and the families of such offenders.
The program must:
(a) Be designed to facilitate and encourage a continuing
relationship between the offenders and the families of such
offenders; and
(b) Provide each offender with a 15-minute telephone call
each day to a member of the family of the offender free of charge.
2. The Department may adopt regulations to administer the
provisions of this section.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an
offender to communicate with a person if the offender is otherwise
prohibited by law or court order from communicating with the
person.
Sec. 2. NRS 209.246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.246 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Director shall, with the approval of the Board, establish by
regulation criteria for a reasonable deduction from money credited
to the account of an offender to:
(a) Repay the cost of:
(1) State property willfully damaged, destroyed or lost by the
offender during his or her incarceration.
(2) Medical examination, diagnosis or treatment for injuries:
(I) Inflicted by the offender upon himself or herself or
other offenders; or
(II) Which occur during voluntary recreational activities.
(3) Searching for and apprehending the offender when he or
she escapes or attempts to escape.
(4) Quelling any riot or other disturbance in which the
offender is unlawfully involved.
(5) Providing a funeral for an offender.
-
*SB323_R1*

– 3 –
(6) Providing an offender with clothing, transportation and
money upon his or her release from prison pursuant to
NRS 209.511.
(7) Transportation of an offender pursuant to a court order in
cases other than a criminal prosecution, a proceeding for
postconviction relief involving the offender or a proceeding in
which the offender has challenged the conditions of his or her
confinement.
(8) Monetary sanctions imposed under the code of penal
discipline adopted by the Department.
(b) Defray, as determined by the Director, a portion of the costs
paid by the Department for medical care for the offender, including,
but not limited to:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (a) and subsection 2, expenses for medical or dental care,
prosthetic devices and pharmaceutical items; and
(2) Expenses for prescribed medicine and supplies.
(c) Repay the costs incurred by the Department on behalf of the
offender for:
(1) Postage for personal items and items related to litigation .
[;]
(2) Photocopying of personal documents and legal
documents, for which the offender must be charged a reasonable fee
not to exceed the actual costs incurred by the Department . [;]
(3) Legal supplies . [;]
(4) [Telephone] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of
this act, audio or video calls charged to the Department . [;] The
Department shall not charge an offender more than the actual
cost to the Department for any audio or video calls made by or to
an offender. If the Department enters into a contract with a
provider of communications services to provide communications
services to offenders, the contract must include, without limitation,
a provision requiring the provider to comply with the provisions of
47 C.F.R. § 64.6130 relating to the return of money deposited into
an IPCS Account, as that section existed on January 1, 2025.
(5) Charges relating to checks returned for insufficient funds
and checks for which an order to stop payment has been made . [;]
(6) Items related to the offender’s work, including, but not
limited to, clothing, shoes, boots, tools, a driver’s license or
identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, a
work card issued by a law enforcement agency and a health card . [;
and]
(7) The replacement of an identification card or prepaid
ticket for bus transportation issued to the offender by the
Department.
-
*SB323_R1*

– 4 –
(d) Repay any cost to the State of Nevada or any agency or
political subdivision thereof that is incurred in defending the State
against an action filed by an offender in federal court alleging a
violation of his or her civil rights which is determined by the court
to be frivolous.
2. The Director shall not adopt any regulations which authorize
a deduction from money credited to the account of an offender for
the payment of any copayment for any routine or emergency
medical care provided to an offender.
3. All money collected pursuant to this section must be
deposited in the appropriate account in the State General Fund for
reimbursement of the related expenditure.
Sec. 2.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections to carry out the
provisions of section 1 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $246,046
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $253,602
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB323_R1*